District of Columbia statutes.
8-636.01

Public notice.

(a)

Prior to the approval of any application or cleanup action plan, and before the issuance of a Certificate of Completion, DDOE shall provide the public with a 14-day notice to comment on the proposed approval or issuance. Public comments required pursuant to this section shall be considered by DDOE in acting upon an application, cleanup action plan, or the issuance of a Certificate of Completion.

(b)

The notice issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be published in the District of Columbia Register, and shall be mailed to the Advisory Neighborhood Commission in the neighborhood where the concerned property is located. The notice may also be published in a newspaper of general circulation.

June 13, 2001, D.C. Law 13-312, § 601, 48 DCR 3804
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-369, § 2(a), 58 DCR 996
This section is referenced in § 8-636.02.
D.C. Law 18-369 substituted “DDOE” for “EHA” wherever it appeared.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of Brownfield Revitalization Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-667, December 28, 2010, 58 DCR 95).